District of Columbia statutes.
29-1006.01

Member’s interest.

A member’s interest shall:

(1)

Be personal property;

(2)

Consist of:

(A)

Governance interests;

(B)

Financial rights; and

(C)

The right or obligation, if any, to do business with the limited cooperative association; and

(3)

May be in certificated or uncertificated form.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.02.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 601 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Editor's Notes